Illinois, session 104th, SB1212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/65)7    Sec. 65. Prohibited areas. 8    (a) A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly carry a 9firearm on or into:10        (1) Any building, real property, and parking area 11    under the control of a public or private elementary or 12    secondary school.13        (2) Any building, real property, and parking area 14    under the control of a pre-school or child care facility, 15    including any room or portion of a building under the 16    control of a pre-school or child care facility. Nothing in 17    this paragraph shall prevent the operator of a child care 18    facility in a family home from owning or possessing a 19    firearm in the home or license under this Act, if no child 20    under child care at the home is present in the home or the 21    firearm in the home is stored in a locked container when a 22    child under child care at the home is present in the home.23        (3) Any building, parking area, or portion of a   SB1212- 2 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1    building under the control of an officer of the executive 2    or legislative branch of government, provided that nothing 3    in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensee from carrying 4    a concealed firearm onto the real property, bikeway, or 5    trail in a park regulated by the Department of Natural 6    Resources or any other designated public hunting area or 7    building where firearm possession is permitted as 8    established by the Department of Natural Resources under 9    Section 1.8 of the Wildlife Code. This paragraph (3) does 10    not apply to any rest areas under the control of the 11    Department of Transportation or to buildings located in 12    rest areas under the control of the Department of 13    Transportation.14        (4) Any building designated for matters before a 15    circuit court, appellate court, or the Supreme Court, or 16    any building or portion of a building under the control of 17    the Supreme Court.18        (5) Any building or portion of a building under the 19    control of a unit of local government.20        (6) Any building, real property, and parking area 21    under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or 22    correctional institution, prison, or jail.23        (7) Any building, real property, and parking area 24    under the control of a public or private hospital or 25    hospital affiliate, mental health facility, or nursing 26    home.  SB1212- 3 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1        (8) Any bus, train, or form of transportation paid for 2    in whole or in part with public funds, and any building, 3    real property, and parking area under the control of a 4    public transportation facility paid for in whole or in 5    part with public funds.6        (9) Any building, real property, and parking area 7    under the control of an establishment that serves alcohol 8    on its premises, if more than 50% of the establishment's 9    gross receipts within the prior 3 months is from the sale 10    of alcohol. The owner of an establishment who knowingly 11    fails to prohibit concealed firearms on its premises as 12    provided in this paragraph or who knowingly makes a false 13    statement or record to avoid the prohibition on concealed 14    firearms under this paragraph is subject to the penalty 15    under subsection (c-5) of Section 10-1 of the Liquor 16    Control Act of 1934.17        (10) Any public gathering or special event conducted 18    on property open to the public that requires the issuance 19    of a permit from the unit of local government, provided 20    this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must 21    walk through a public gathering in order to access his or 22    her residence, place of business, or vehicle.23        (11) Any building or real property that has been 24    issued a Special Event Retailer's license as defined in 25    Section 1-3.17.1 of the Liquor Control Act during the time 26    designated for the sale of alcohol by the Special Event   SB1212- 4 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1    Retailer's license, or a Special use permit license as 2    defined in subsection (q) of Section 5-1 of the Liquor 3    Control Act during the time designated for the sale of 4    alcohol by the Special use permit license.5        (12) Any public playground.6        (13) Any public park, athletic area, or athletic 7    facility under the control of a municipality or park 8    district, provided nothing in this Section shall prohibit 9    a licensee from carrying a concealed firearm while on a 10    trail or bikeway if only a portion of the trail or bikeway 11    includes a public park.12        (14) Any real property under the control of the Cook 13    County Forest Preserve District.14        (15) Any building, classroom, laboratory, medical 15    clinic, hospital, artistic venue, athletic venue, 16    entertainment venue, officially recognized 17    university-related organization property, whether owned or 18    leased, and any real property, including parking areas, 19    sidewalks, and common areas under the control of a public 20    or private community college, college, or university.21        (16) Any building, real property, or parking area 22    under the control of a gaming facility licensed under the 23    Illinois Gambling Act or the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 24    1975, including an inter-track wagering location licensee.25        (17) Any stadium, arena, or the real property or 26    parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or any   SB1212- 5 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1    collegiate or professional sporting event.2        (18) Any building, real property, or parking area 3    under the control of a public library.4        (19) Any building, real property, or parking area 5    under the control of an airport.6        (20) Any building, real property, or parking area 7    under the control of an amusement park.8        (21) Any building, real property, or parking area 9    under the control of a zoo or museum.10        (22) Any street, driveway, parking area, property, 11    building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used 12    by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site 13    or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory 14    Commission. The licensee shall not under any circumstance 15    store a firearm or ammunition in his or her vehicle or in a 16    compartment or container within a vehicle located anywhere 17    in or on the street, driveway, parking area, property, 18    building, or facility described in this paragraph.19        (23) Any area where firearms are prohibited under 20    federal law.21    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a public or 22private community college, college, or university from:23        (1) prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm within 24    a vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by the college or 25    university;26        (2) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies   SB1212- 6 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1    regarding student, employee, or visitor misconduct and 2    discipline, including suspension and expulsion;3        (3) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 4    regarding the storage or maintenance of firearms, which 5    must include designated areas where persons can park 6    vehicles that carry firearms; and7        (4) permitting the carrying or use of firearms for the 8    purpose of instruction and curriculum of officially 9    recognized programs, including but not limited to military 10    science and law enforcement training programs, or in any 11    designated area used for hunting purposes or target 12    shooting.13    (a-10) The owner of private real property of any type may 14prohibit the carrying of concealed firearms on the property 15under his or her control. The owner must post a sign in 16accordance with subsection (d) of this Section indicating that 17firearms are prohibited on the property, unless the property 18is a private residence.19    (b) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (a-5), and (a-10) of 20this Section except under paragraph (22) or (23) of subsection 21(a), any licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm 22into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in 23subsection (a), (a-5), or (a-10) of this Section shall be 24permitted to carry a concealed firearm on or about his or her 25person within a vehicle into the parking area and may store a 26firearm or ammunition concealed in a case within a locked   SB1212- 7 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1vehicle or locked container out of plain view within the 2vehicle in the parking area. A licensee may carry a concealed 3firearm in the immediate area surrounding his or her vehicle 4within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited 5purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within the 6vehicle's trunk. For purposes of this subsection, "case" 7includes a glove compartment or console that completely 8encloses the concealed firearm or ammunition, the trunk of the 9vehicle, or a firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other 10container.11    (c) A licensee shall not be in violation of this Section 12while he or she is traveling along a public right of way that 13touches or crosses any of the premises under subsection (a), 14(a-5), or (a-10) of this Section if the concealed firearm is 15carried on his or her person in accordance with the provisions 16of this Act or is being transported in a vehicle by the 17licensee in accordance with all other applicable provisions of 18law.19    (d) Signs stating that the carrying of firearms is 20prohibited shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the 21entrance of a building, premises, or real property specified 22in this Section as a prohibited area, unless the building or 23premises is a private residence. Signs shall be of a uniform 24design as established by the Illinois State Police and shall 25be 4 inches by 6 inches in size. The Illinois State Police 26shall adopt rules for standardized signs to be used under this   SB1212- 8 -LRB104 03895 RLC 13919 b1subsection.2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.